Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201360-484
Operator's license
required, when; state identification card; application.

(1)(a)
This subsection applies until the implementation date designated by the director
on or before January 1, 2014. Except as otherwise provided in the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act, no resident of the State of Nebraska shall operate
a motor vehicle upon the alleys or highways of this state until the person
has obtained an operator's license for that purpose.

(b) Application for an operator's license or a state identification
card shall be made in a manner prescribed by the department. Such application
may be made to department personnel in any county. Department personnel shall
conduct the examination of the applicant and deliver to each successful applicant
an issuance certificate containing the statements made pursuant to subdivision
(c) of this subsection.

(c) The applicant (i) shall provide his or her full legal
name, date of birth, mailing address, gender, race or ethnicity, and social
security number, two forms of proof of address of his or her principal residence
unless the applicant is a program participant under the Address Confidentiality
Act, evidence of identity as required by subdivision (1)(f) of this subsection,
and a brief physical description of himself or herself, (ii) may complete
the voter registration portion pursuant to section 32-308, (iii) shall be
provided the advisement language required by subsection (5) of section 60-6,197,
(iv) shall answer the following:

(A) Have you within the last three months (e.g. due to diabetes,
epilepsy, mental illness, head injury, stroke, heart condition, neurological
disease, etc.):

(I) lost voluntary control or consciousness ... yes ... no

(II) experienced vertigo or multiple episodes of dizziness
or fainting ... yes ... no

(III) experienced disorientation ... yes ... no

(IV) experienced seizures ... yes ... no

(V) experienced impairment of memory, memory loss ... yes
... no

Please explain: .................................

(B) Do you experience any condition which affects your ability
to operate a motor vehicle? (e.g. due to loss of, or impairment of, foot,
leg, hand, arm; neurological or neuromuscular disease, etc.) ... yes ... no

Please explain: ...................................

(C) Since the issuance of your last driver's license/permit,
has your health or medical condition changed or worsened? ... yes ... no

Please explain, including how the above affects your ability
to drive: .................., and (v) may answer the following:

(A) Do you wish to register to vote as part of this application
process?

(B) Do you
wish to have the word "veteran" displayed on the front of your operator's
license or state identification card to show that you served in the armed
forces of the United States? (To be eligible you must register with the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs registry.)

OPTIONAL
- YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO ANSWER ANY OF THE FOLLOWING QUESTIONS:

(C) Do you wish to be an organ
and tissue donor?

(D) Do you wish to receive
any additional specific information regarding organ and tissue donation and
the Donor Registry of Nebraska?

(E) Do you wish to donate
$1 to promote the Organ and Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund?

(d) Application for an operator's license or state identification
card shall include a signed oath, affirmation, or declaration of the applicant
that the information provided on the application for the license or card is
true and correct.

(e) The social security number shall not be printed on the
operator's license or state identification card and shall be used only (i)
to furnish information to the United States Selective Service System under
section 60-483, (ii) with the permission of the director in connection with
the verification of the status of an individual's driving record in this state
or any other state, (iii) for purposes of child support enforcement pursuant
to section 42-358.08 or 43-512.06, (iv) to furnish information regarding an
applicant for or holder of a commercial driver's license with a hazardous
materials endorsement to the Transportation Security Administration of the
United States Department of Homeland Security or its agent, or (v) to furnish
information to the Department of Revenue under section 77-362.02.

(f)(i) Each individual applying for an operator's license
or a state identification card shall furnish proof of date of birth and identity
with documents containing a photograph or with nonphoto identity documents
which include his or her full legal name and date of birth. Such documents
shall include, but not be limited to, any valid Nebraska operator's license
or Nebraska state identification card, a valid operator's license or identification
card from another state or jurisdiction of the United States, a certified
birth certificate, a valid United States passport, or any other United States-based
identification as approved by the director.

(ii) Any individual under the age of eighteen years applying
for an operator's license or a state identification card shall provide a certified
copy of his or her birth certificate or, if such individual is unable to provide
a certified copy of his or her birth certificate, other reliable proof of
his or her identity and age, as required in subdivision (1)(f)(i) of this
section, accompanied by a certification signed by a parent or guardian explaining
the inability to produce a copy of such birth certificate. The applicant also
may be required to furnish proof to department personnel that the parent or
guardian signing the certification is in fact the parent or guardian of such
applicant.

(iii) An applicant may present other documents as proof of
identification and age designated by the director. Any documents accepted
shall be recorded according to a written exceptions process established by
the director.

(g) Any individual
applying for an operator's license or a state identification card who indicated
his or her wish to have the word "veteran" displayed on the front of such
license or card shall comply with section 60-4,189.

(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning on an implementation date
designated by the director on or before January 1, 2014. Except as otherwise
provided in the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, no resident of the State
of Nebraska shall operate a motor vehicle upon the alleys or highways of this
state until the person has obtained an operator's license for that purpose.

(b) Application for an operator's license or a state identification
card shall be made in a manner prescribed by the department. Such application
may be made to department personnel in any county. Department personnel shall
conduct the examination of the applicant and deliver to each successful applicant
an issuance certificate containing the statements made pursuant to subdivision
(c) of this subsection.

(c) The applicant shall provide his or her full legal name,
date of birth, mailing address, gender, race or ethnicity, and social security
number, two forms of proof of address of his or her principal residence unless
the applicant is a program participant under the Address Confidentiality Act,
evidence of identity as required by subdivision (2)(f) of this subsection,
and a brief physical description of himself or herself. The applicant (i)
may also complete the voter registration portion pursuant to section 32-308,
(ii) shall be provided the advisement language required by subsection (5)
of section 60-6,197, (iii) shall answer the following:

(A) Have you within the last three months (e.g. due to diabetes,
epilepsy, mental illness, head injury, stroke, heart condition, neurological
disease, etc.):

(I) lost voluntary control or consciousness ... yes ... no

(II) experienced vertigo or multiple episodes of dizziness
or fainting ... yes ... no

(III) experienced disorientation ... yes ... no

(IV) experienced seizures ... yes ... no

(V) experienced impairment of memory, memory loss ... yes
... no

Please explain: .................................

(B) Do you experience any condition which affects your ability
to operate a motor vehicle? (e.g. due to loss of, or impairment of, foot,
leg, hand, arm; neurological or neuromuscular disease, etc.) ... yes ... no

Please explain: ...................................

(C) Since the issuance of your last driver's license/permit,
has your health or medical condition changed or worsened? ... yes ... no

Please explain, including how the above affects your ability
to drive: .................., and (iv) may answer the following:

(A) Do you wish to register to vote as part of this application
process?

(B) Do you
wish to have the word "veteran" displayed on the front of your operator's
license or state identification card to show that you served in the armed
forces of the United States? (To be eligible you must register with the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs registry.)

OPTIONAL
- YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO ANSWER ANY OF THE FOLLOWING QUESTIONS:

(C) Do you wish to be an organ
and tissue donor?

(D) Do you wish to receive
any additional specific information regarding organ and tissue donation and
the Donor Registry of Nebraska?

(E) Do you wish to donate
$1 to promote the Organ and Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund?

(d) Application for an operator's license or state identification
card shall include a signed oath, affirmation, or declaration of the applicant
that the information provided on the application for the license or card is
true and correct.

(e) The social security number shall not be printed on the
operator's license or state identification card and shall be used only (i)
to furnish information to the United States Selective Service System under
section 60-483, (ii) with the permission of the director in connection with
the verification of the status of an individual's driving record in this state
or any other state, (iii) for purposes of child support enforcement pursuant
to section 42-358.08 or 43-512.06, (iv) to furnish information regarding an
applicant for or holder of a commercial driver's license with a hazardous
materials endorsement to the Transportation Security Administration of the
United States Department of Homeland Security or its agent, or (v) to furnish
information to the Department of Revenue under section 77-362.02.

(f)(i) Each individual applying for an operator's license
or a state identification card shall furnish proof of date of birth and identity
with documents containing a photograph or with nonphoto identity documents
which include his or her full legal name and date of birth. Such documents
shall be those provided in subsection (2) of section 60-484.04.

(ii) Any individual under the age of eighteen years applying
for an operator's license or a state identification card shall provide a certified
copy of his or her birth certificate or, if such individual is unable to provide
a certified copy of his or her birth certificate, other reliable proof of
his or her identity and age, as required in subdivision (2)(f)(i) of this
section, accompanied by a certification signed by a parent or guardian explaining
the inability to produce a copy of such birth certificate. The applicant also
may be required to furnish proof to department personnel that the parent or
guardian signing the certification is in fact the parent or guardian of such
applicant.

(iii) An applicant may present other documents as proof of
identification and age designated by the director. Any documents accepted
shall be recorded according to a written exceptions process established by
the director.

(g) Any individual
applying for an operator's license or a state identification card who indicated
his or her wish to have the word "veteran" displayed on the front of such
license or card shall comply with section 60-4,189.

(h) No person shall be a holder
of an operator's license and a state identification card at the same time.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 1, p. 512;

C.S.1929, § 60-401;

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 11, p. 510;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-401;

R.S.1943, § 60-403;

Laws 1945, c. 141, § 1, p. 446;

Laws 1947, c. 207, § 1, p. 675;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 35, p. 1269;

Laws 1961, c. 315, § 2, p. 998;

Laws 1961, c. 316, § 2, p. 1007;

Laws 1984, LB 811, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 153, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 878, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 300, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-403;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 35;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 44;

Laws 1992, LB 1178, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 571;

Laws 1994, LB 211, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 939, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1073, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 20;

Laws 1999, LB 147, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 34, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 387, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 559, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 1, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB93, § 3.
July 1, 2014
Address Confidentiality Act, see section 42-1201.

Donor Registry of Nebraska, see section 71-4822.

Nebraska Department of Veterans' Affairs registry, see section 80-414.

Driving a motor vehicle requires that driver be licensed; there is no unfettered constitutional right to travel by whatever means a person chooses. State v. Meints, 223 Neb. 199, 388 N.W.2d 813 (1986).

Licensure of drivers hereunder is in interest of public safety and, when one drives in violation of statute, it is evidence of negligence which may be considered by the jury. Benton v. State, 124 Neb. 485, 247 N.W. 21 (1933).